Wisconsin, session 2025, AB467.
do enact as follows:AB467,11Section 1. 108.04 (2) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB467,2,42108.04 (2) (a) (intro.) Except as provided in pars. par. (b) to (bd), sub. (16) (am) 3and (b), and s. 108.062 (10) and (10m) and as otherwise expressly provided, a 4claimant is eligible for benefits as to any given week only if all of the following apply:AB467,25Section 2. 108.04 (2) (a) 3. of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB467,3,26108.04 (2) (a) 3. The claimant conducts a reasonable search for suitable work 7during that week and provides verification of that search to the department. The 8search for suitable work must include at least 4 actions per week that constitute a 9reasonable search as prescribed by rule of the department. In addition, the 10department may, by rule, require a claimant to take more than 4 reasonable work 11search actions in any week. The department shall require a uniform number of 12reasonable work search actions for similar types of claimants. This subdivision 13does not apply to a claimant if the department determines that the claimant is 14currently laid off from employment with an employer but there is a reasonable 15expectation of reemployment of the individual by that employer. In determining 16whether the claimant has a reasonable expectation of reemployment by an 1employer, the department shall request the employer to verify the claimant’s 2employment status and shall consider all of the following:AB467,3,33a. The history of layoffs and reemployments by the employer.AB467,3,54b. Any information that the employer furnished to the claimant or the 5department concerning the claimant’s anticipated reemployment date.AB467,3,76c. Whether the claimant has recall rights with the employer under the terms 7of any applicable collective bargaining agreement.AB467,38Section 3. 108.04 (2) (b) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB467,3,119108.04 (2) (b) 1. The department may, by rule, establish waivers from the 10registration for work requirement under par. (a) 2. and the work search 11requirement under par. (a) 3.AB467,3,21122. a. The department may promulgate rules under subd. 1. as emergency 13rules, using the procedure under s. 227.24, if the secretary of workforce 14development determines that the waiver is needed only on a temporary basis or that 15permanent rules are not warranted. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the 16department is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this 17subd. 2. a. as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the public 18peace, health, safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of 19emergency for a rule promulgated under this subd. 2. a. Except as provided under 20subd. 2. b., a rule promulgated under this subd. 2. a. remains in effect only for 150 21days.AB467,4,422b. Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (2), the secretary of workforce development may 23extend the effective period of an emergency rule promulgated under subd. 2. a. for a 24period specified by the secretary not to exceed 60 days. Any number of extensions 1may be granted under this subd. 2. b. Whenever the secretary extends an 2emergency rule under this subd. 2. b., it shall file a statement of its action with the 3legislative reference bureau. The statement shall identify the specific emergency 4rule to which it relates.AB467,45Section 4. 108.04 (2) (bb) of the statutes is repealed.AB467,56Section 5. 108.04 (2) (bd) of the statutes is repealed.AB467,67Section 6. 108.04 (2) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB467,4,158108.04 (2) (bm) A claimant is ineligible to receive benefits for any week for 9which there is a determination that the claimant failed to comply with the 10registration for work and work search requirements under par. (a) 2. or 3. or failed 11to provide verification to the department that the claimant complied with those 12requirements, unless the department has waived those requirements under par. 13(b), (bb), or (bd) or s. 108.062 (10m). If the department has paid benefits to a 14claimant for any such week, the department may recover the overpayment under s. 15108.22.AB467,716Section 7. Initial applicability.AB467,4,1817(1) This act first applies to initial claims for benefits filed on the effective date 18of this subsection.AB467,819Section 8. Effective date.AB467,4,2020(1) This act takes effect on the first Sunday after publication.AB467,4,2121